trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="CM_car">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>car</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>car</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cant</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cant</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>co</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>que</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pi1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cav</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ii1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>càv</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>car</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quí</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>car</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pp1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cà</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>càr</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qu</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ps_or"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qu</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qué</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_és"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>que</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_es"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>car</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_cond"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qui</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quem</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>queu</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quin</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qui</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quem</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>queu</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quin</l>
          <r>car<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <i>impli</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>desemboli</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sufo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>advo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>esbron</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>adjudi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>apli</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>autentifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tan</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>convo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>classifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>codifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>cer</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>cor</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>man</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>dedi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>desconvo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>dignifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>dupli</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>entretan</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>emboli</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>equivo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>especifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>evo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>expli</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>indi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>invo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>justifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>aixe</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>modifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>multipli</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>embutxa</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>practi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>provo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>publi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tren</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>reto</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>revo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>asse</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>signifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sindi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>to</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>trasto</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>abo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>clarifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ata</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fal</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tru</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>mar</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>radi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>eradi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>arren</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>arris</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>califi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>col·lo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>compli</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>comuni</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>criti</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>desembo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>desta</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>edifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>edu</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>embar</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>enderro</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>enfo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>apar</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>caval</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>xo</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>diagnosti</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>qualifi</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>emmar</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fabri</i>
        <par n="CM_car"/>
      </e>
